Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “intimate image”  means an image depicting
sexual conduct as defined in ORS 167.051 or uncovered human genitals.
(2) A plaintiff may bring a civil action against a person who, after attaining 18  years of
age, transmits an intimate image by computer or other  electronic means to the computer
or other electronic communication device of the plaintiff, if:
(a) The person  transmitted the intimate image with the intent to harass, degrade or
humiliate the plaintiff and without the consent of the plaintiff;
(b) The person knew or reasonably should have  known that the plaintiff did not consent
to the transmission of the image;
(c) The plaintiff is harassed,  degraded or humiliated by the transmission of the image;
and
(d) A reasonable person would  be harassed, degraded or humiliated by the transmission
of the image.
(3) A plaintiff who prevails in an action under this section may recover the greater of:
(a) The plaintiff’s economic and noneconomic damages resulting from all transmissions
of intimate images transmitted by  the defendant to the plaintiff actionable under this sec-
tion, in an amount not to exceed $10,000; or
(b) $500.
(4) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a plaintiff who  prevails in an action
under this section.
(5) An action under this  section must be commenced not later than two years after the
conduct that gives rise to the claim.
(6) A person may not bring a claim under this section against:
(a) An Internet service provider, mobile data provider or operator  of an online or mobile
application, to the extent that the provider or operator is transmitting,  routing or providing
connections for electronic communications initiated by or at the direction of another;
(b) A service  that transmits an intimate image, including an on-demand, subscription or
advertising-supported service; or
(c) A health care provider that  transmits an intimate image for a legitimate medical
purpose.
Enrolled House Bill 3766 (HB 3766-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to claims that arise under section 1 of this
2025 Act on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3766 (HB 3766-A) Page 2